Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202654-192.01
Satisfactory evidence of ownership; interpretation by the Nebraska Brand Committee.

(1) For purposes of interpretation by the Nebraska Brand Committee, by any employee of the Nebraska Brand Committee, or by any agent of the Nebraska Brand Committee, each occurrence of the term satisfactory evidence of ownership that is in the Livestock Brand Act means satisfactory evidence of ownership as defined in section 54-189.

(2) The Nebraska Brand Committee, any employee of the Nebraska Brand Committee, and any agent of the Nebraska Brand Committee shall interpret each occurrence in the Livestock Brand Act of the term satisfactory evidence of ownership as provided in this section.

Laws 2026, LB1187, § 9.
July 18, 2026